Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
10A

ACCIDENT
AND HEALTH OR SICKNESS INSURANCE CONTRACTS

Note

Article heading amended by L 2002, c 155, §48.

State innovation waiver task force; health care reform
plan; reports to 2015-2017 legislature (dissolved June 30, 2017). L 2014, c 158;
L 2015, c 184.

Cross References

Conformance to federal law, see §431:2-201.5.

Federally qualified health centers; rural health clinics;
reimbursement, see §346-53.6.

Health and dental insurance data; mandatory reporting for
certain insurers, see §323D-18.5.

Health maintenance organization act, see chapter 432D.

Medicaid-related mandates, see chapter 431L.

Mental health and alcohol and drug abuse treatment insurance
benefits, see chapter 431M.

Patients' bill of rights and responsibilities act, see
chapter 432E.

Prescription drug benefits, see chapter 431R.

Prescription drugs; mail order opt out option, see §87A-16.3.

Proposed mandatory health insurance coverage and assessment
report, see §§23-51, 52.

State health insurance program, see chapter 431N.

Attorney General Opinions

Section 431:10A-601 applied to all parts of article 10A if
the category of policy under consideration included family coverage, as defined
in §431:10A-103. Att. Gen. Op. 97-10.

The placement of §431:10A-601 in this article, regulating
content of insurance contracts, makes clear that the legislative intent was to
mandate benefits that must be made available by insurers that write contracts
of insurance providing family coverage. Att. Gen. Op. 97-10.

Law Journals and Reviews

Tax Justice and Same-Sex Domestic Partner Health Benefits:
An Analysis of the Tax Equity For Health Plan Beneficiaries Act. 32 UH L. Rev.
73 (2009).

Case Notes

As chapter 432D does not cover the field of managed care
regulation and because §§432D-2, 432E-1, and this article can be read together
and there is no explicit language or policy reason not to give each statute
effect, chapter 432D does not repeal chapter 432E by implication. 126 H. 326,
271 P.3d 621 (2012).

Properly licensed HMOs, like plaintiff, were authorized
pursuant to §432D-1 to "provide or arrange", at their option, for the
closed panel health care services required under the managed care plan program;
accident and health insurers were authorized under §431:10A-205(b) to arrange
for medical services for members using a defined network of providers, i.e.,
particular "hospitals or persons"; thus, this article and chapter
432D authorized both accident and health insurers and HMOs, as risk-bearing
entities, to provide the closed panel product required by the managed care plan
contracts. 126 H. 326, 271 P.3d 621 (2012).

PART I.
INDIVIDUAL ACCIDENT AND HEALTH

OR
SICKNESS POLICIES

Note

Part heading amended by L 2002, c 155, §48.

Attorney General Opinions

Section 431:10A-601 applied to all parts of article 10A if
the category of policy under consideration included family coverage, as defined
in §431:10A-103. Att. Gen. Op. 97-10.

Case Notes

Under this article and §431:10A-105(2)(A)(ii), standard
"incontestability clause" of contract precluded insurer from denying
insured "total disability benefit" contracted for, notwithstanding
that HIV infection that caused the disability arguably "manifested"
itself prior to policy's effective date of coverage. 86 H. 262, 948 P.2d 1103.

§431:10A-101 Applications and exceptions.
This part shall apply to all policies of accident and health or sickness
insurance delivered or issued for delivery in this State, except that nothing
in this part shall apply to or affect:

(1) Any policy of workers' compensation insurance or
any policy of vehicle or liability insurance with or without supplementary
coverage therein;

(2) Any policy or contract of reinsurance;

(3) Any blanket or group policy of insurance; or

(4) Life insurance, endowment, or annuity contracts,
or contracts supplemental thereto which contain only such provisions relating
to accident and health or sickness insurance as:

(A) Provide additional benefits in case of
death, dismemberment, or loss of sight by accident; or

(B) Operate to safeguard such contracts
against lapse, or to give a special surrender value, special benefit, or an
annuity in the event that the insured or annuitant shall become totally and
permanently disabled, as defined by the contract or supplemental contract. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 155, §49]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next